fdic-to-hunspell/resultat/dictionaries.catalan.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: haver
SFX 5C Y 73
SFX 5C r r/_C_Y er
SFX 5C r nt/_C er
SFX 5C ver gut/_V_Y er
SFX 5C ver guda/_Y er
SFX 5C ver guts/_Y er
SFX 5C ver gudes/_Y er
SFX 5C ver ig/_Z er
SFX 5C aver e/_Z er
SFX 5C ver s/_Z er
SFX 5C ver 0/_Z er
SFX 5C r m/_Z er
SFX 5C aver em/_Z er
SFX 5C r u/_Z er
SFX 5C aver eu/_Z er
SFX 5C ver n/_Z er
SFX 5C er ia/_Z er
SFX 5C er ies/_Z er
SFX 5C er ia/_Z er
SFX 5C er íem/_Z er
SFX 5C er íeu/_Z er
SFX 5C er ien/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guí/_Z er
SFX 5C ver gueres/_Z er
SFX 5C ver gué/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guérem/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guéreu/_Z er
SFX 5C ver gueren/_Z er
SFX 5C ver uré/_Z er
SFX 5C ver uràs/_Z er
SFX 5C ver urà/_Z er
SFX 5C ver urem/_Z er
SFX 5C ver ureu/_Z er
SFX 5C ver uran/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guera/_Z er
SFX 5C ver uria/_Z er
SFX 5C ver gueres/_Z er
SFX 5C ver uries/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guera/_Z er
SFX 5C ver uria/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guérem/_Z er
SFX 5C ver uríem/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guéreu/_Z er
SFX 5C ver uríeu/_Z er
SFX 5C ver gueren/_Z er
SFX 5C ver urien/_Z er
SFX 5C ver ja/_Z er
SFX 5C ver gi/_Z er
SFX 5C ver ges/_Z er
SFX 5C ver gis/_Z er
SFX 5C ver ja/_Z er
SFX 5C ver gi/_Z er
SFX 5C aver àgem/_Z er
SFX 5C aver àgim/_Z er
SFX 5C aver àgeu/_Z er
SFX 5C aver àgiu/_Z er
SFX 5C ver gen/_Z er
SFX 5C ver gin/_Z er
SFX 5C ver gués/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guera/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guessis/_Z er
SFX 5C ver gueres/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guesses/_Z er
SFX 5C ver gués/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guera/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guéssim/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guérem/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guéssem/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guéssiu/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guéreu/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guésseu/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guessin/_Z er
SFX 5C ver gueren/_Z er
SFX 5C ver guessen/_Z er
# Model de conjugació: heure
SFX 5D Y 82
SFX 5D eure aure/_D_Y re
SFX 5D eure aver/_C_Y re
SFX 5D e e/_D_Y re
SFX 5D eure avent/_C re
SFX 5D eure agut/_V_Y re
SFX 5D eure aguda/_Y re
SFX 5D eure aguts/_Y re
SFX 5D eure agudes/_Y re
SFX 5D eure ac/_Z re
SFX 5D ure c/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aus/_Z re
SFX 5D re s/_Z re
SFX 5D eure au/_Z re
SFX 5D re 0/_Z re
SFX 5D eure avem/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aveu/_Z re
SFX 5D eure auen/_Z re
SFX 5D re en/_Z re
SFX 5D eure avia/_Z re
SFX 5D eure avies/_Z re
SFX 5D eure avia/_Z re
SFX 5D eure avíem/_Z re
SFX 5D eure avíeu/_Z re
SFX 5D eure avien/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguí/_Z re
SFX 5D eure agueres/_Z re
SFX 5D eure agué/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguérem/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguéreu/_Z re
SFX 5D eure agueren/_Z re
SFX 5D eure auré/_Z re
SFX 5D eure auràs/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aurà/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aurem/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aureu/_Z re
SFX 5D eure auran/_Z re
SFX 5D eure auria/_Z re
SFX 5D eure auries/_Z re
SFX 5D eure auria/_Z re
SFX 5D eure auríem/_Z re
SFX 5D eure auríeu/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aurien/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aga/_Z re
SFX 5D eure agui/_Z re
SFX 5D ure gui/_Z re
SFX 5D eure agues/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguis/_Z re
SFX 5D ure guis/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aga/_Z re
SFX 5D eure agui/_Z re
SFX 5D ure gui/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguem/_Z re
SFX 5D eure agueu/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguen/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguin/_Z re
SFX 5D ure guin/_Z re
SFX 5D eure agués/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguera/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguessis/_Z re
SFX 5D eure agueres/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguesses/_Z re
SFX 5D eure agués/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguera/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguéssim/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguérem/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguéssem/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguéssiu/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguéreu/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguésseu/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguessin/_Z re
SFX 5D eure agueren/_Z re
SFX 5D eure aguessen/_Z re
SFX 5D eure au/_C re
SFX 5D re 0/_C re
SFX 5D eure aga/_D re
SFX 5D eure agui/_D re
SFX 5D ure gui/_D re
SFX 5D eure aguem/_C re
SFX 5D eure aveu/_C re
SFX 5D eure aguen/_C re
SFX 5D eure aguin/_C re
SFX 5D ure guin/_C re
# Model de conjugació: imprimir
SFX 5E Y 91
SFX 5E r r/_C_Y ir
SFX 5E r nt/_C ir
SFX 5E imir ès/_V_Y ir
SFX 5E imir és/_V_Y ir
SFX 5E imir esa/_Y ir
SFX 5E imir esos/_Y ir
SFX 5E imir eses/_Y ir
SFX 5E ir eixo/_Z ir
SFX 5E r sc/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir esc/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir eixes/_Z ir
SFX 5E r xes/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir eix/_Z ir
SFX 5E r x/_Z ir
SFX 5E r m/_Z ir
SFX 5E r u/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir eixen/_Z ir
SFX 5E r xen/_Z ir
SFX 5E r a/_Z ir
SFX 5E r es/_Z ir
SFX 5E r a/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 5E r en/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir í/_Z ir
SFX 5E r res/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir í/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 5E r ren/_Z ir
SFX 5E r ré/_Z ir
SFX 5E r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 5E r rà/_Z ir
SFX 5E r rem/_Z ir
SFX 5E r reu/_Z ir
SFX 5E r ran/_Z ir
SFX 5E r ria/_Z ir
SFX 5E r ries/_Z ir
SFX 5E r ria/_Z ir
SFX 5E r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 5E r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 5E r rien/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 5E r sca/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir esques/_Z ir
SFX 5E r sques/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir esquis/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir eixis/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 5E r sca/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 5E r m/_Z ir
SFX 5E r guem/_Z ir
SFX 5E r u/_Z ir
SFX 5E r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir esquen/_Z ir
SFX 5E r squen/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir esquin/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir eixin/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 5E r ra/_Z ir
SFX 5E r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 5E r res/_Z ir
SFX 5E r sses/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 5E r ra/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 5E r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 5E r ren/_Z ir
SFX 5E r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 5E ir eix/_C ir
SFX 5E r x/_C ir
SFX 5E ir esca/_D ir
SFX 5E r sca/_D ir
SFX 5E ir esqui/_D ir
SFX 5E ir eixi/_D ir
SFX 5E r m/_C ir
SFX 5E r guem/_C ir
SFX 5E r u/_C ir
SFX 5E ir esquen/_C ir
SFX 5E r squen/_C ir
SFX 5E ir esquin/_C ir
SFX 5E ir eixin/_C ir
# Model de conjugació: irèixer
SFX 5F Y 91
SFX 5F r r/_C_Y er
SFX 5F èixer eixent/_C er
SFX 5F èixer escut/_V_Y er
SFX 5F èixer escuda/_Y er
SFX 5F èixer escuts/_Y er
SFX 5F èixer escudes/_Y er
SFX 5F èixer eixo/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esc/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixes/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eix/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixem/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixeu/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixen/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixia/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixies/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixia/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixíem/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixíeu/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixien/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixí/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquí/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixeres/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esqueres/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixé/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esqué/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixérem/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquérem/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixéreu/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquéreu/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixeren/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esqueren/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixeré/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixeràs/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixerà/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixerem/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixereu/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixeran/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixeria/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixeries/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixeria/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixeríem/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixeríeu/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixerien/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esca/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esqui/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixi/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esques/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquis/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixis/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esca/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esqui/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixi/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixem/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquem/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixeu/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esqueu/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquen/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquin/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixin/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixés/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esqués/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquera/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixessis/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquessis/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esqueres/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquesses/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixés/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esqués/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquera/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixéssim/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquéssim/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquérem/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquéssem/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixéssiu/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquéssiu/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquéreu/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquésseu/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eixessin/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquessin/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esqueren/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer esquessen/_Z er
SFX 5F èixer eix/_C er
SFX 5F èixer esca/_D er
SFX 5F èixer esqui/_D er
SFX 5F èixer eixi/_D er
SFX 5F èixer eixem/_C er
SFX 5F èixer esquem/_C er
SFX 5F èixer eixeu/_C er
SFX 5F èixer esquen/_C er
SFX 5F èixer esquin/_C er
SFX 5F èixer eixin/_C er
# Model de conjugació: júnyer
SFX 60 Y 70
SFX 60 r r/_C_Y er
SFX 60 únyer unyent/_C er
SFX 60 únyer unyut/_V_Y er
SFX 60 únyer unyuda/_Y er
SFX 60 únyer unyuts/_Y er
SFX 60 únyer unyudes/_Y er
SFX 60 únyer unyo/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer uny/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unys/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer uny/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyem/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyeu/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyen/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyia/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyies/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyia/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyíem/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyíeu/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyien/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyí/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyeres/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyé/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyérem/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyéreu/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyeren/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyeré/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyeràs/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyerà/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyerem/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyereu/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyeran/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyeria/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyeries/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyeria/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyeríem/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyeríeu/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyerien/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unya/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyi/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyes/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyis/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unya/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyi/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyem/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyeu/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyen/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyin/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyés/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyera/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyessis/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyeres/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyesses/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyés/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyera/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyéssim/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyérem/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyéssem/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyéssiu/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyéreu/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyésseu/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyessin/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyeren/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer unyessen/_Z er
SFX 60 únyer uny/_C er
SFX 60 únyer unya/_D er
SFX 60 únyer unyi/_D er
SFX 60 únyer unyem/_C er
SFX 60 únyer unyeu/_C er
SFX 60 únyer unyen/_C er
SFX 60 únyer unyin/_C er
# Model de conjugació: jeure
SFX 61 Y 90
SFX 61 eure aure/_D_Y re
SFX 61 e e/_D_Y re
SFX 61 eure aient/_C re
SFX 61 eure aent/_C re
SFX 61 eure agut/_V_Y re
SFX 61 eure aguda/_Y re
SFX 61 eure aguts/_Y re
SFX 61 eure agudes/_Y re
SFX 61 eure ac/_Z re
SFX 61 ure c/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aus/_Z re
SFX 61 re s/_Z re
SFX 61 eure au/_Z re
SFX 61 re 0/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aiem/_Z re
SFX 61 ure im/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aieu/_Z re
SFX 61 ure is/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aeu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auen/_Z re
SFX 61 re en/_Z re
SFX 61 ure ia/_Z re
SFX 61 ure ies/_Z re
SFX 61 ure ia/_Z re
SFX 61 eure èiem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure éiem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure èieu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure éieu/_Z re
SFX 61 ure ien/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguí/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agueres/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agué/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguérem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguéreu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agueren/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auré/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auràs/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aurà/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aurem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aureu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auran/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auria/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auries/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auria/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auríem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure auríeu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aurien/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aga/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agui/_Z re
SFX 61 ure gui/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agues/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguis/_Z re
SFX 61 ure guis/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aga/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agui/_Z re
SFX 61 ure gui/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agueu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguen/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguin/_Z re
SFX 61 ure guin/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agués/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguera/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguessis/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agueres/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguesses/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agués/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguera/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguéssim/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguérem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguéssem/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguéssiu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguéreu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguésseu/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguessin/_Z re
SFX 61 eure agueren/_Z re
SFX 61 eure aguessen/_Z re
SFX 61 eure au/_C re
SFX 61 re 0/_C re
SFX 61 eure aga/_D re
SFX 61 eure agui/_D re
SFX 61 ure gui/_D re
SFX 61 eure aguem/_C re
SFX 61 eure aieu/_C re
SFX 61 ure is/_C re
SFX 61 eure aeu/_C re
SFX 61 eure aguen/_C re
SFX 61 eure aguin/_C re
SFX 61 ure guin/_C re
